Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.121, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Livestreaming. new text end new text begin (a) The county auditor, municipal clerk, or school district clerk must ensure that all ballot board activity is livestreamed as provided in this subdivision and section 203B.155. This requirement applies during the absentee voting period, on election day, and on the day following the election day if absentee ballots are being processed. At a minimum, the following activities must be recorded: new text end new text begin (1) examining envelopes and accepting or rejecting envelopes as required under subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) opening envelopes and duplicating ballots, if necessary, as required under subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (3) depositing absentee ballots into a ballot box as required under subdivision 5, paragraph (a); and new text end new text begin (4) counting and tabulating the ballots as required under subdivision 5, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) The county auditor, municipal clerk, or school district clerk must position one or more cameras to record the following: new text end new text begin (1) the ballot board members performing the activities described in paragraph (a); new text end new text begin (2) all ballots in the room where the activities in paragraph (a) are taking place; and new text end new text begin (3) all doors in the room where the activities in paragraph (a) are taking place. new text end new text begin To the extent possible while complying with clauses (1) to (3), the cameras must be positioned so as to avoid recording private data included on absentee ballot envelopes or other documents. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective September 1, 2025, and applies to elections conducted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [203B.155] LIVESTREAMING REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of information technology services. new text end new text begin (c) "Department" means the Department of Information Technology Services. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Livestreaming. new text end new text begin (a) Where livestreaming is required by section 203B.121, the commissioner must ensure the livestream is available on the department's website in a manner that allows members of the public to easily access and view the livestream. The commissioner must record all livestreamed video and retain the recording for at least 22 months after the date of the recording. Notwithstanding chapter 13 or any other law to the contrary, the county auditor, city clerk, or school board clerk is not required to maintain any livestreamed or recorded data or provide access to the data. The commissioner must not charge any fee to the public or to the county, municipality, or school district for providing this service. new text end new text begin (b) The secretary of state must include information on the office's website on how to find and access videos on the department's website. Each county auditor, municipal clerk, and school district clerk must post the same information on their respective local government's website, if there is one. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Data. new text end new text begin The commissioner must retain video recordings of livestreamed activities required in section 203B.121, as provided by this section. The recordings are public data, except that the commissioner may obscure private data on individuals that is visible on a recording. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Livestream disruptions. new text end new text begin If a livestream is disrupted or disabled, the commissioner, county auditor, municipal clerk, or school district clerk is not liable if the disruption is due to a cause outside of the control of the commissioner, county auditor, municipal clerk, or school district clerk. If there is a disruption, the commissioner must work with the county auditor, municipal clerk, or school district clerk to reinstate video coverage as soon as possible. If appointed ballot board observers are present and there is a disruption in livestreaming, the activities of the ballot board may continue. If appointed ballot board observers are not present and there is a disruption in livestreaming, the ballot board must stop all activities until one of the following occurs: new text end new text begin (1) the livestream is reinstated; new text end new text begin (2) ballot board observers are present; or new text end new text begin (3) the county auditor, municipal clerk, or school district clerk arranges the activities to be recorded in a manner that substantially complies with the requirements of this section and section 203B.121, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin Within 24 hours of the livestream being reinstated, the county auditor, municipal clerk, or school district clerk must transmit any recordings made pursuant to clause (3) to the commissioner to be posted on the department's website. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective September 1, 2025, and applies to elections conducted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated to the commissioner of information technology services to implement the requirements of this act. The base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter is $........ new text end